Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1608
Industry trade association, defined.

Industry trade association means an organization which represents a segment of the industry and which is exempt from tax under section 501(c)(3) or (6) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 8.